California statutes. Education Code
(1) Competency-based driver training which means a program in which each student receives a minimum of three hours of on-street behind-the-wheel practice driving instruction, a minimum of one hour of behind-the-wheel pretesting, and a minimum of one hour of behind-the-wheel posttesting. The pretest and posttest for public school programs shall include basic skill evaluation by the instructor, as adopted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to paragraph (2). The one hour posttest shall be conducted by an instructor other than the instructor who conducted the three hours of behind-the-wheel practice driving instruction or the pretest. Each student shall receive at least one additional hour of either
 behind-the-wheel practice driving instruction or observation time.

(2) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall adopt rules, regulations, and basic skill requirements for public school programs pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) Local district superintendents offering this program shall annually report to the Superintendent of Public Instruction, on a form developed by the State Department of Education, on student completion of instruction pursuant to paragraph (1).

(f) For purposes of this section, one hour means 60 minutes including passing time.

(g) Any deviation from the standard use of a simulator or off-street multiple-car driving range, or both, shall have prior approval by the Department of Education before the school district, county
 superintendent of schools, the California Youth Authority, or the Department of Education can be reimbursed for the students trained.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to direct or restrict courses of instruction in the classroom phase or the laboratory phase of driver education offered by private elementary and secondary schools or to require the use of credentialed or certified instructors in the laboratory phase of driver education offered by private elementary and secondary schools, except that each student enrolled in a course shall satisfactorily complete a minimum of six hours of on-street behind-the-wheel driving instruction. This section shall not be construed to limit eligibility for a provisional driver’s license for pupils who have completed driver education or driver training courses offered in private elementary or secondary schools.

(i) For the purposes
 of this section, private elementary or secondary schools are those subject to the provisions of Sections 33190 and 48222.

(j) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2004.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 774, Sec. 1.5.   Effective September 21, 2002.   Section operative July 1, 2004, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

51853.

Any reference in this code to automobile driver training shall be deemed to refer to the laboratory phase of driver education described by Section 51852.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51854.

(a) The State Department of Education shall adopt rules and regulations requiring all automobile driver training vehicles to be fitted with instrumentation providing instructional information on fuel consumption and vehicle fuel efficiency such as fuel efficiency meters or computerized fuel equipment.

(b) The department shall conduct workshops to provide in-service training to automobile driver training instructors on fuel-efficient driving which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following instructional techniques:

(1) Minimization of braking.

(2) Brisk acceleration to high gear.

(3) Methods to emphasize deceleration modes.

(4) Reduce idling.

(5) Methods to anticipate stops and to maintain safe distances between vehicles.

(6) The use of momentum and gravity to save fuel.

(7) Driving at the most fuel-efficient and safe speeds.

(8) Smooth steering, turning, acceleration, and braking.

(9) The use of fuel-efficient driving instrumentation to remind
 drivers of methods for fuel-efficient driving.

(c) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall review claims submitted by school districts for reimbursement for the costs of fitting automobile driver training vehicles with instrumentation providing information on fuel consumption and vehicle fuel efficiency required by subdivision (a) and may approve claims for reimbursement up to three hundred dollars ($300) per vehicle for the installation of this equipment, including parts and labor. The superintendent may approve claims for reimbursement for the transfer of equipment from one vehicle to another at the reimbursement rates authorized for the replacement of automobile driver training vehicles and simulators. Allowances made to school districts under this subdivision during the first year that the program is in operation shall be allocated by the superintendent from the Petroleum Violation Escrow Account. Allowances made to school districts
 under this subdivision in subsequent years shall be allocated by the superintendent from the Driver Training Penalty Assessment Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1339, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Bicycle Safety Instruction [51860. - 51860.]

51860.

(a) The governing board of any school district having jurisdiction over any elementary, intermediate, junior high, or high school may provide time and facilities to any local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the schools of the district, as well as to other organizations, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 38134, or public agencies that provide bicycle, scooter, electric bicycle, motorized bicycle, or motorized scooter safety instruction, for bicycle, scooter, electric bicycle, motorized bicycle, or
 motorized scooter safety instruction.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Electric bicycle” has the same meaning as in Section 312.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) “Motorized bicycle” has the same meaning as in Section 406 of the Vehicle Code.

(3) “Motorized scooter” has the same meaning as in Section 407.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 116, Sec. 1.   (AB 2028)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14.5. California Distance Learning Policy [51865. - 51865.]

51865.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that legislation be enacted to implement the policy objectives set forth in this section with regard to distance learning. For purposes of this article, “distance learning” means instruction in which the pupil and instructor are in different locations and interact through the use of computer and communications technology. Distance learning may include video or audio instruction in which the primary mode of communication between pupil and instructor is instructional television, video, telecourses, or any other instruction that relies on computer or communications technology.

(b) Distance learning should be utilized by the state to achieve the following educational goals:

(1) Equity in education, which requires that every pupil in California’s public schools, and every adult in the state, have equal access to educational opportunities, regardless of where he or she lives or how small a school the pupil attends.

(2) Quality in education, which would be enhanced through the creative application of telecommunications, as pupils are given the opportunity to interact with pupils from other cultures and geographical locations, and with outstanding educators from other educational institutions.

(3) Diversity among educational institutions, which has been recognized in California through the support of various types of public educational institutions as well as of independent and private colleges and universities. Distance learning technology permits greater diversity in the means of instruction
 and in the delivery of educational and training services to an adult population that is more and more likely to seek education outside of the traditional baccalaureate program designed for four consecutive years on a full-time basis shortly after graduating from high school.

(4) Efficiency and accountability, which receive increasing emphasis as state budget resources become increasingly restricted. Distance learning technologies can be effective only through the cooperative efforts of individuals from different institutions, a collaboration that has the potential to reduce costs and increase efficiency. A technology-integrated educational delivery system would allow for the electronic transmittal of files and reports, thus providing the information needed for accountability more rapidly and at a lower cost, and for video teleconferencing for state and local education and other government agencies, thereby diminishing travel requirements.

(c) To the extent that funding is made available for this purpose, a coordinated distance learning system should be developed to serve the following high priority education needs:

(1) The enhancement of work force skills and competency in the adult population.

(2) The expansion of adult education classes in English as a second language, in response to the growing level of unmet need for that instruction.

(3) The enhancement of curriculum to meet the needs of high-risk pupils who would be likely to drop out of traditional classroom programs.

(4) The expansion of course offerings in subjects that include, but are not limited to, world languages, science, and mathematics, to rural and
 inner-city secondary schools that are unable to provide the college preparatory and enrichment courses that their pupils require and that other secondary schools provide.

(5) The expansion of course offerings at community colleges and off-campus centers to better serve students in all parts of the state. This expansion should include university-level courses, to better serve community college students who seek a university-level education but do not have the financial resources to transfer to a university.

(6) The establishment of staff development courses for elementary school, secondary school, and community college teachers who otherwise might be unable to participate in training opportunities.

(7) The enhancement of curriculum through an increased communication capability on the part of schools, colleges, and
 universities, providing the opportunity for those institutions to receive various types of supplementary educational programs, conduct exchanges with business, industry, and government, participate in live lectures and conferences on special topics, and increase cooperation and communication with other educational institutions.

(d) The state should encourage the use of multiple technologies in distance learning education, including microwave, satellite, and public/private switched network delivery systems. Priority in this regard should be placed upon interconnecting the various delivery systems, while providing educators with the opportunity to experiment with each alternative distance learning technology.

(e) The state shall recognize the value of regional networks serving regional needs, as well as the value of a statewide network.

(f) In expanding the use of distance learning technology, the state should emphasize the delivery of education and training services to populations currently not receiving those services, the ease of access by educational institutions to the technology, and the lower cost over time of providing instruction through distance learning rather than on site.

(g) The state should employ incentives, rather than requirements, to induce educational institutions to expand their utilization of distance learning technologies.

(h) The state should ensure that the same standards are applied to distance learning for course and program quality, course content, pupil achievement levels, and coherence of curriculum that are currently applied for those purposes to traditional classroom instruction at public educational institutions.

(i) The state should encourage collaboration between the private sector and educational institutions in the use of technology, both to enhance the quality of education in the classroom and to expand the delivery of educational services to the worksite.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 24.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Aquatic Safety [51879.7. - 51879.9.]

51879.7.

The Legislature finds that, given the great diversity of water recreation activities available statewide and the significant loss of life associated with those activities, there is a great need for an aquatic safety program in the state.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article that fundamental water safety training be provided for all the children of the state so that California’s youth will be able to enjoy water recreation while avoiding its hazards.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 51880 (as added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1033) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

51879.8.

The Department of Boating and Waterways, in cooperation with the State Department of Education and other appropriate agencies, industry, and nonprofit organizations involved with water safety, shall develop an aquatic safety program which shall be made available for use at an appropriate grade level in public elementary schools, as determined by the Director of Boating and Waterways, at no expense to the schools. The aquatic education program shall include, but not be limited to, an audiovisual instructional aid and parental involvement materials. The Department of Boating and Waterways shall act as liaison between the schools and school districts and the industry and nonprofit organizations involved with water safety.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 51881 (as added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1033) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

51879.9.

Once developed, the Department of Boating and Waterways shall notify the schools and school districts of the availability of the aquatic safety program.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 51882 (as added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1033) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Comprehensive Health Education [51880. - 51929.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [51880. - 51881.5.]

51880.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Comprehensive Health Education Act of 1977.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 809.)
-------------------------------------------

51881.

The Legislature finds and declares that although many of the communicable diseases and environmental hazards which plagued earlier generations have been controlled, major health problems and hazards are prevalent among today’s school-age children and youth including the abuse of alcohol, narcotics, and tobacco; emotional instability; forced marriage; self-medication; dental caries; nutritional disorders; suicide; and accidents.

The Legislature finds and declares that an adequate health education program in the public schools is essential to continued progress and improvement in the quality of public health in this state, and the Legislature further believes that comprehensive health education, taught by properly trained persons, is effective in the prevention of disease and disability.

It is further the intent of the Legislature that, to the maximum extent possible, the present state-funded projects in the school health unit of the Department of Education shall be redirected to carrying out the provisions of this chapter and maximum use shall be made of existing state and federal funds in the implementation of comprehensive health education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 809.)
-------------------------------------------

51881.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that hazardous substances, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 78075 of the Health and Safety Code, are an integral part of daily life, and that some substances, which are routinely found in and around homes, present potential hazards to the public and to the environment because of the lack of public awareness and education on the hazards of these substances and because of the lack of safe disposal options for hazardous substances from households.

(b) The Legislature, therefore, finds that hazardous substances education programs in the public schools would serve a beneficial purpose by fostering in students an understanding of their role in protecting the environment, and in
 safeguarding themselves from other health and safety dangers which may be posed by hazardous substances.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department provide school districts with information concerning the availability of educational materials and curricula on hazardous substances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 14.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [51890. - 51891.]

51890.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, “comprehensive health education programs” are defined as all educational programs offered in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in the public school system, including in-class and out-of-class activities designed to ensure that:

(1) Pupils will receive instruction to aid them in making decisions in matters of personal, family, and community health, to include the following subjects:

(A) The use of health care services and products.

(B) Mental and emotional health and development.

(C) Drug use and misuse, including the misuse of tobacco and alcohol.

(D) Family health and child development, including the legal and financial aspects and responsibilities of marriage and parenthood.

(E) Oral health, vision, and hearing.

(F) Nutrition, which may include related topics such as obesity and diabetes.

(G) Exercise, rest, and posture.

(H) Diseases and disorders, including sickle cell anemia and related genetic diseases and disorders.

(I) Environmental health and safety.

(J) Community health.

(2) To the maximum extent possible, the instruction in health is structured to provide comprehensive education in health that includes all the subjects in paragraph (1).

(3) The community actively participates in the teaching of health including classroom participation by practicing professional health and safety personnel in the community.

(4) Pupils gain appreciation for the importance and value of lifelong health and the need for each individual to take responsibility for his or her own health.

(5) School districts may voluntarily provide pupils with instruction on preventative health care, including obesity and diabetes prevention through nutrition education.

(b) Health care professionals, health care service plans, health care providers, and other entities participating in a voluntary initiative with a school district may not market their services when undertaking activities related to the initiative. For purposes of this subdivision, “marketing” is defined as making a communication about a product or service that is intended to encourage recipients of the communication to purchase or use the product or service. Health care or health education information provided in a brochure or pamphlet that contains the logo or name of a health care service plan or health care organization is not considered marketing if provided in coordination with the voluntary initiative. The marketing prohibitions contained in this subdivision do not apply to outreach, application assistance, and enrollment activities relating to federal, state, or county sponsored health care insurance programs that are conducted by health care professionals, health care service plans, health care providers, and other entities if the activities are conducted in compliance with the statutory, regulatory, and programmatic guidelines applicable to those programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

51891.

As used in this chapter, “community participation” means the active participation in the planning, implementation, and evaluation of comprehensive health education by parents, professional practicing health care and public safety personnel, and public and private health care and service agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 809.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Department of Education [51900. - 51901.]

51900.

The department shall prepare and distribute to school districts guidelines for the preparation of comprehensive health education plans, and, in cooperation with those county offices of education which desire to participate, assist school districts in developing comprehensive health education plans and programs. For this purpose, the department shall assume the following functions and carry out the following duties:

(a) Assist in the development of model curricula for the public schools for comprehensive health education programs consistent with the provisions and intent of approved district comprehensive health education plans.

(b) Identify innovative teaching methods for the instruction in health in the public schools.

(c) With the cooperation and assistance of the State Department of Health, develop methods of evaluating the effectiveness of instruction in health.

(d) Develop model instructional materials for comprehensive health education courses and make these materials available to local school districts.

(e) In cooperation with the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, assist teacher training institutions in development of courses on comprehensive health education.

(f) Assist in the development of adult education programs which include parents, students, and community health agencies and personnel.

(g) With the cooperation of, and assistance of, the qualified instructional staffs of state-supported public institutions of higher education, develop and establish a health education training program for public school teachers and administrators to provide in-service training at the local district or regional level.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

51900.1.

The department, in consultation with the State Department of Developmental Services and the State Department of Public Health, shall gather and make available on its internet website school-based water safety and drowning prevention education resources and curriculum that are age appropriate to pupils of different grade levels and adaptable for public school use. The department is encouraged to refer to the existing, freely accessible, age- and grade-appropriate curriculum that has been identified by relevant water safety and drowning prevention stakeholder organizations and that can be used in school settings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 387, Sec. 5.   (AB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

51900.5.

(a) During the next revision of the publication “Health Framework for California Public Schools” (health framework), the Instructional Quality Commission shall consider developing, and recommending for adoption by the state board, a distinct category on mental health instruction to educate pupils about all aspects of mental health. 

(b) As used in this section, “mental health instruction” shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Reasonably designed and age-appropriate instruction on the overarching themes and core principles of mental
 health.

(2) Defining common mental health challenges such as depression, suicidal thoughts and behaviors, schizophrenia, bipolar disorder, eating disorders, and anxiety, including post-traumatic stress disorder.

(3) Elucidating the services and supports that effectively help individuals manage mental health challenges.

(4) Promoting mental health wellness, which includes positive development, social connectedness and supportive relationships, resiliency, problem solving skills, coping skills, self-esteem, and a positive school and home environment in which pupils feel comfortable.

(5) Ability to identify warning signs of common mental health problems in
 order to promote awareness and early intervention so pupils know to take action before a situation turns into a crisis. This should include instruction on both of the following:

(A) How to appropriately seek and find assistance from mental health professionals and services within the school district and in the community for themselves or others.

(B) Appropriate evidence-based research and practices that are proven to help overcome mental health challenges.

(6) The connection and importance of mental health to overall health and academic success as well as to cooccurring conditions, such as chronic physical conditions and chemical dependence and substance abuse.

(7) Awareness and appreciation about the prevalence of mental health challenges across all populations, races, ethnicities, and socioeconomic statuses, including the impact of culture on the experience and treatment of mental health challenges.

(8) Stigma surrounding mental health challenges and what can be done to overcome stigma, increase awareness, and promote acceptance. This shall include, to the extent possible, classroom presentations of narratives by peers and other individuals who have experienced mental health challenges, and how they coped with their situations, including how they sought help and acceptance.

(c) In
 the normal course of recommending curriculum frameworks to the state board, as required by Section 60204, the Instructional Quality Commission shall ensure that one or more experts in the mental health and educational fields provides input in the development of the mental health instruction in the health framework. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Instructional Quality Commission seek experts from culturally, racially, and ethnically diverse communities, representatives from all mental health professions, teachers, counselors, parents, those involved in promoting mental wellness, and those living with a mental health challenge and their families.

(d) This section does not require or authorize
 the Instructional Quality Commission to recommend new health education content standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 481, Sec. 2.   (SB 330)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

51900.6.

(a) (1) The state board shall, based upon recommendations by the Superintendent, consider including age-appropriate content for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in sexual abuse and sexual assault awareness and prevention in the next revision of the health content standards.

(2) The state board shall, based upon recommendations by the Instructional Quality Commission, consider including information in sexual abuse and sexual assault awareness and prevention in the Health Framework for California Public Schools when next revised.

(b) (1) School districts, county offices of education,
 and charter schools may provide age-appropriate instruction, pursuant to the content standards adopted by the state board under subdivision (a), for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, as applicable, in sexual abuse and sexual assault awareness and prevention.

(2) Upon written request of the pupil’s parent or legal guardian, a pupil in kindergarten or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, shall be excused from taking instruction in sexual abuse and sexual assault awareness and prevention established pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 809, Sec. 1.   (AB 2016)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

51901.

The Department of Education shall be responsible for the preparation and distribution of health education materials and for providing assistance for in-service teaching programs carried out with districts that have plans approved pursuant to Section 51911.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 809.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Comprehensive Health Education Plans [51911. - 51915.]

51911.

Approval of district plans shall be made in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the State Board of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 809.)
-------------------------------------------

51913.

The plan for a comprehensive health education program shall include a statement setting forth the district’s educational program for health education on a districtwide basis. The state board shall establish standards and criteria to be used in the evaluation of plans submitted by school districts. The standards and criteria for review and approval of plans by the state board shall include, but not be limited to, provision for:

(a) Assessment of the health educational needs of the pupils.

(b) Defined and measurable program objectives and methods of assessing the effectiveness of the program.

(c) Coordination of all district resources with the objectives of the plan.

(d) Utilization of health care professionals representing, at the school district’s option, the varied fields of health care, including voluntary collaborations with managed health care and health care providers; local public and private health, safety, and community service agencies; and other appropriate community resources in the development and implementation of the plan.

(e) Direct participation of health care professionals representing, at the school district’s option, the varied fields of health care, including voluntary collaborations with managed health care, health care providers, and local public and private health, safety, and community service agencies in the course evaluation.

(f) Staff development and in-service
 training.

(g) Evaluation of the program by the governing board of the school district with the assistance of administrators, teachers, parents, pupils, and participants in the program from the community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 70.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

51914.

No plan shall be approved by the State Board of Education unless it determines that the plan was developed with the active cooperation of parents, community, and teachers, in all stages of planning, approval, and implementation of the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 809.)
-------------------------------------------

51915.

In the development of a plan for a comprehensive health education program, the governing board of a school district may include in such plan the employment of the following as resource persons, with or without compensation: (a) licensed physicians and surgeons, school or public health nurses, county health officers, optometrists, dentists, and other persons licensed by the state to practice in allied health professions, and other persons recognized by the governing board as being experts in the health sciences.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 809.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. In-Service Training [51920. - 51921.]

51920.

The Department of Education shall reimburse all school certificated personnel from those school districts in which the governing board has adopted a comprehensive health education plan approved by the Department of Education according to this chapter for necessary travel and expenses resulting from participation in health education in-service training programs sponsored by the department.

When training is held during the time that the certificated personnel are employed in teaching, their regular pay shall not be diminished by reason of their attendance.

Reimbursements shall not include the cost of hiring substitute classroom teaching personnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 809.)
-------------------------------------------

51921.

School district governing boards may, at their discretion, assign units of credit for participation in in-service training programs undertaken pursuant to this chapter and such units may be included as units of credit for purposes of the salary schedule of the school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 809.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Mandatory Mental Health Education  [51925. - 51929.]

51925.

Each school district, county office of education, state special school, and charter school that offers one or more courses in health education to pupils in middle school or high school shall include in those courses instruction in mental health that meets the requirements of this article. This section shall not be construed to limit a school district, county office of education, state special school, or charter school in offering or requiring instruction in mental health as specified in this article. This instruction shall include all of the following:

(a) Reasonably designed instruction on the overarching themes and core principles of mental health.

(b) Defining signs and symptoms of common mental health challenges. Depending on pupil age and developmental level, this may include defining conditions such as depression, suicidal thoughts and behaviors, schizophrenia, bipolar disorder, eating disorders, and anxiety, including post-traumatic stress disorder.

(c) Elucidating the evidence-based services and supports that effectively help individuals manage mental health challenges.

(d) Promoting mental health wellness and protective factors, which includes positive development, social and cultural connectedness and supportive relationships, resiliency, problem solving skills, coping skills, self-esteem, and a positive school and home environment in which pupils feel
 comfortable.

(e) The ability to identify warning signs of common mental health problems in order to promote awareness and early intervention so that pupils know to take action before a situation turns into a crisis. This shall include instruction on both of the following:

(1) How to seek and find assistance from professionals and services within the school district that includes, but is not limited to, school counselors with a pupil personnel services credential, school psychologists, and school social workers, and in the community for themselves or others.

(2) Evidence-based and culturally responsive practices that are proven to help overcome mental health challenges.

(f) The connection and importance of mental health to overall health and academic success and to co-occurring conditions, such as chronic physical conditions, chemical dependence, and substance abuse.

(g) Awareness and appreciation about the prevalence of mental health challenges across all populations, races, ethnicities, and socioeconomic statuses, including the impact of race, ethnicity, and culture on the experience and treatment of mental health challenges.

(h) Stigma surrounding mental health challenges and what can be done to overcome stigma, increase awareness, and promote acceptance. This shall include, to the extent possible, classroom presentations of narratives by trained peers and other individuals who have experienced mental health challenges and how
 they coped with their situations, including how they sought help and acceptance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 675, Sec. 2.   (SB 224)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

51926.

Instruction and materials required pursuant to this article shall satisfy all of the following: 

(a) Be appropriate for use with pupils of all races, genders, sexual orientations, and ethnic and cultural backgrounds, pupils with disabilities, and English learners.

(b) Be accessible to pupils with disabilities, including, but not limited to, providing a modified curriculum, materials and instruction in alternative formats, and auxiliary aids.

(c) Not reflect or promote bias against any person on the basis of any category protected by Section 220.

(d) Be coordinated with any existing on-campus mental health providers including, but not limited to, providers with a pupil personnel services credential, who may be immediately called upon by pupils for assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 675, Sec. 2.   (SB 224)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

51927.

(a) This article does not limit a pupil’s health and mental health privacy or confidentiality rights.

(b) A pupil receiving instruction pursuant to this article shall not be required to disclose their confidential health or mental health information at any time in the course of receiving that instruction, including, but not limited to, for the purpose of the peer component described in subdivision (h) of Section 51925.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 675, Sec. 2.   (SB 224)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

51928.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Age appropriate” has the same meaning as defined in Section 51931.

(b) “English learner” has the same meaning as defined in Section 51931.

(c) “Evidence-based” means verified or supported by research conducted in compliance with scientific methods and published in peer-reviewed journals, where appropriate, and recognized as accurate and objective by professional organizations and agencies with expertise in the mental health field.

(d) “Instructors trained in the appropriate courses” means instructors with knowledge of the most recent evidence-based research on mental health.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 675, Sec. 2.   (SB 224)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

51929.

On or before January 1, 2024, the department shall develop a plan to expand mental health instruction in California public schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 675, Sec. 2.   (SB 224)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.6. California Healthy Youth Act [51930. - 51939.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [51930. - 51932.]

51930.

(a) This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Healthy Youth Act.

(b) The purposes of this chapter are as follows:

(1) To provide pupils with the knowledge and skills necessary to protect their sexual and reproductive health from HIV and other sexually transmitted infections and from unintended pregnancy.

(2) To provide pupils with the knowledge and skills they need to develop healthy attitudes concerning adolescent growth and development, body image, gender, sexual orientation, relationships, marriage, and
 family.

(3) To promote understanding of sexuality as a normal part of human development.

(4) To ensure pupils receive integrated, comprehensive, accurate, and unbiased sexual health and HIV prevention instruction and provide educators with clear tools and guidance to accomplish that end.

(5) To provide pupils with the knowledge and skills necessary to have healthy, positive, and safe relationships and behaviors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 398, Sec. 2.   (AB 329)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

51931.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Age appropriate” refers to topics, messages, and teaching methods suitable to particular ages or age groups of children and adolescents, based on developing cognitive, emotional, and behavioral capacity typical for the age or age group.
